Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-114
Kennard home; Nebraska Statehood Memorial; designated.

The Thomas P. Kennard home, located at 1627 H Street in Lincoln, including lot 3, Block 153, of the original plat of Lincoln, is hereby designated as the Nebraska Statehood Memorial.

Laws 1965, c. 556, § 1, p. 1839.